Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 2. Arbitration of Small Claims.

Cross references. —

For small claims actions in district courts, see AS

22.15.040

; for district court rules providing for practice and procedure in small claims actions, see Dist. Ct. Civ. Rules 8 to 22.

Editor’s notes. —

To date, the supreme court has not adopted rules under this article.

Sec. 09.43.190.
Arbitration under court rules.

The supreme court may provide by rule for compulsory arbitration of a cause of action filed in a superior or district court, demanding only a money judgment, when it appears that the demand on the cause of action is for $3,000 or less, exclusive of costs, or when it appears to the trial court as a result of a pretrial conference that the amount that will be recovered on the cause is not likely to exceed $3,000.

History.

(§ 2 ch 94 SLA 1972)

Sec. 09.43.200.
Appointment and compensation of arbitrator.

Arbitration of actions shall be by either a member of the Alaska Bar Association or a magistrate appointed and compensated by the court as provided by its rules.

History.

(§ 2 ch 94 SLA 1972)

Sec. 09.43.210.
Practice and procedure.

The practice and procedure for conducting arbitration, the powers of the arbitrators, and the assessment of costs shall be prescribed by the court rules.

History.

(§ 2 ch 94 SLA 1972)

Sec. 09.43.220.
Judgments and appeals.

Unless an appeal is taken from the award to the court that ordered arbitration as provided by the court rules, the court shall enter and enforce judgment in accordance with the award of the arbitrator.
Any party aggrieved by the award may appeal.
All appeals shall be determined in the manner permitted by the rules.

History.

(§ 2 ch 94 SLA 1972)